South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4254.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-59-120 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-59-120. School guidance counselors and career specialists shall limit their activities to guidance and counseling and may not perform administrative tasks. If the State Board of Education, upon recommendation of the State Superintendent of Education, determines that a district is in violation of this section, the department may withhold up to five percent of the district's aid to classroom appropriation for that fiscal year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----